South Dakota, session 2026, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 43-32-33 be AMENDED:
43-32-33. For the purposes of Terms used in §§ 43-32-34 to 43-32-36, inclusive,
the term, service animal, refers to, mean:
(1) "Assistance animal," any animal that serves a role for an individual with a disability
as an emotional support animal, any, service, or therapy animal, or any assistance
animal, and the term, disability, is in a manner that is necessary for the health of
an individual; and
(2) "Disability," a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more
major life activities of a person an individual.
Section 2. That § 43-32-34 be AMENDED:
43-32-34. A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a landlord Except as
otherwise provided in this section, a lessor may require a tenant lessee of the landlord's
lessor's rental dwelling unit to provide reliable supporting documentation be provided by
a tenant of a rental dwelling unit, if the tenant lessee asserts a disability requiring, under
any provision of law, that a service animal or an assistance animal be allowed as an
accommodation on the rented premises.
A The landlord The lessor may not require supporting documentation from a the
tenant the lessee if the tenant's lessee's disability or disability-related need for a service
animal or an assistance animal is readily apparent or already known to the landlord lessor.
The landlord lessor is not required to grant a reasonable accommodation for an
assistance animal if:
(1) The rental dwelling unit is in an owner-occupied building with four or fewer units;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1231A 2 1231
(2) The rental dwelling unit is a single-family home, which the owner is attempting to
sell or rent, without the assistance of a real estate agent or broker, provided the
owner does not own more than three single-family homes; or
(3) The specific animal poses a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals
or would cause substantial physical damage to the property of others, which may
not be eliminated or reduced by reasonable modifications, based on an
individualized assessment of the animal's actual conduct and not on assumptions
about the animal's breed, size, or type.
Section 3. That § 43-32-35 be AMENDED:
43-32-35. The Reliable supporting documentation shall provided by a tenant
lessee pursuant to § 43-32-34:
(1) Must confirm the tenant's lessee's disability and the relationship between the
tenant's lessee's disability and the need for the requested accommodation. The
documentation shall;
(2) Must be issued no more than one year before the date of the request for
accommodation, unless the disability or disability-related need is readily apparent,
permanent, or ongoing;
(3) Must originate from a licensed health care provider who does not operate in this
state solely to provide certification for service or assistance animals:
(a) Is licensed in this state;
(b) Is acting within the scope of the provider's licensure;
(b)(c) Has personal knowledge of the tenant lessee through a professional
provider-patient relationship;
(c)(d) Conducted an individualized assessment of the tenant lessee; and
(d)(e) Is familiar with the tenant's lessee's disability and functional limitations;
(4)(3) Must be on the provider's official letterhead, containing the provider's contact
information and medical license number; and
(5)(4) May be obtained through online or telehealth services, provided that the
documentation is issued only after final review and a written attestation by the
provider that the documentation reflects an individualized determination of the
tenant's lessee's disability-related need for the requested accommodation.
A landlord lessor may verify the authenticity of supporting documentation by
confirming the provider's licensure and that the documentation was issued specifically for
the tenant lessee.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1231A 3 1231
Section 4. That § 43-32-36 be AMENDED:
43-32-36. If a person tenant lessee is found to have knowingly made a false claim
of having a disability that requires the use of a service animal or an assistance animal, or
of knowingly providing fraudulent supporting documentation in connection with such a the
claim, a the lessor the landlord may evict a the lessee and the lessor the tenant. The
landlord lessor is entitled to a damage fee, not to exceed exceeding one thousand dollars,
from a the lessee the tenant if the lessee tenant provides fraudulent disability
documentation indicating a disability requiring the use of a service animal or an assistance
animal.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.